Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-230
Constitutional convention; delegates; compensation.

The members of the constitutional convention shall each receive twelve hundred dollars and the same mileage as authorized in section 81-1176 for state employees.

Laws 1953, c. 173, § 19, p. 553;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 85.